hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.aff
SFX t N 52
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]бу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]ву sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]гу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]ду sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]жу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]зу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]ку sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]қу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]лу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]му sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]ну sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]һу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]пу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]ру sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]су sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]ту sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]фу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]ху sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]цу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]чу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]шу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у амыз [аоуұыэ]щу sf:амыз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у еміз [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:еміз:1
SFX t у йміз [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:йміз:1
SFX t у ймыз [аоуұыэ]у sf:ймыз:1
SFX t ю йеміз [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йеміз:1
SFX t ю йамыз [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йамыз:1
SFX U N 52
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]бу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]ву sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]гу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]ду sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]жу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]зу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]ку sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]қу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]лу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]му sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]ну sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]һу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]пу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]ру sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]су sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]ту sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]фу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]ху sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]цу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]чу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]шу sf:асың:1
SFX U у асың [аоуұыэ]щу sf:асың:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:есің:1
SFX U у есің [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:есің:1
SFX U у йсің [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:йсің:1
SFX U у йсың [аоуұыэ]у sf:йсың:1
SFX U ю йесің [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йесің:1
SFX U ю йасың [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йасың:1
SFX u N 52
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]бу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ву sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]гу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ду sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]жу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]зу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ку sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асындар [аоуұыэ]қу sf:асындар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]лу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]му sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ну sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]һу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]пу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ру sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]су sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ту sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]фу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]ху sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]цу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]чу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]шу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у асыңдар [аоуұыэ]щу sf:асыңдар:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у есіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:есіңдер:1
SFX u у йсіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:йсіңдер:1
SFX u у йсыңдар [аоуұыэ]у sf:йсыңдар:1
SFX u ю йесіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йесіңдер:1
SFX u ю йасыңдар [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йасыңдар:1
SFX V N 52
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]бу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ву sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]гу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ду sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]жу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]зу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ку sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]қу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]лу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]му sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ну sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]һу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]пу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ру sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]су sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ту sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]фу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]ху sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]цу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]чу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]шу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у асыз [аоуұыэ]щу sf:асыз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у есіз [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:есіз:1
SFX V у йсіз [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:йсіз:1
SFX V у йсыз [аоуұыэ]у sf:йсыз:1
SFX V ю йесіз [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йесіз:1
SFX V ю йасыз [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йасыз:1
