hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.dic
азсыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
айқалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
алмалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аптығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аршу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
атастыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ауырсыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аялдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ақылсыздану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
байланысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
балшылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
басылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
баялдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бедіреңдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
белдену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
блокадалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
борағыту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
брезенттеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
быжырқайлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бықсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бітіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бүрсеңдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұрылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
гектарлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
декорациялау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
діңкию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ексіту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ертелету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жайпау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жамшылау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жаттау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жентектеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жылжу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жұтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
зырылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
иіскелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
келтелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кешелдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кіртию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
күнәкарлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
көлбеңдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
лақтыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
малдырту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
марқалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
маңдайлату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
меңіреу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мыжу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мүліктену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мәуелету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
обу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
озбырлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ортқу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
оңашалану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
реконструкциялау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
салтақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
саумалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
селдірету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
созу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сулау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сыпайысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сіміру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сұлусыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тайтаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тармақтану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
теңгеру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
толғанту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
торландыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тоқайластыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
туындатқызу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тырбану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тықыраңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тітіреу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түйткілесу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түрегелгізу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түтелендіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұнықталу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұщыландыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
төмпектеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
уағыздау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шабалақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шалжақтаттыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шапалақтасу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шарылдату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шағылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шегіншектеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шеңберлендіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шолтиту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шуақтату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шүйіркелесу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шөміштеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ысқылау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ірімтіктену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қаймығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қалқию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қарасындау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қарымдылау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қатыстыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қаярсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қилау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қодыраю/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қомпию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қорқау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қуару/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қырылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қышқылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құнарлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үдемелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үмелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үңгірлену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ұту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
әңгімелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
өсіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
